csv2yaml/yaml_output/VTA_s.yaml
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+2Pl+3SgProx: mawadisaasiweg
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+2Pl+Excl: mawadishisiwaang
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+2Sg+1Sg: mawadishisiwan
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+2Sg+3PlProx: mawadisaasiwadwaa
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+2Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv: mawadisimaasiwad
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+2Sg+3SgProx: mawadisaasiwad
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+2Sg+Excl: mawadishisiwaang
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3PlProx+1Sg: mawadishisigwaa
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3PlProx+2Pl: mawadisisinowegwaa
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3PlProx+2Sg: mawadisisinokwaa
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3PlProx+3SgObv/3PlObv: mawadisaasigwaa
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3PlProx+Excl: mawadishisiwangidwaa
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3PlProx+Incl: mawadisisinowangwaa
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3SgObv/3PlObv+3PlProx: mawadisigosigwaa
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3SgObv/3PlObv+3SgProx: mawadisigosig
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3SgProx+1Sg: mawadishisig
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3SgProx+2Pl: mawadisisinoweg
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3SgProx+2Sg: mawadisisinok
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3SgProx+3SgObv/3PlObv: mawadisaasig
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3SgProx+Excl: mawadishisiwangid
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3SgProx+Incl: mawadisisinowang
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+Excl+2Pl: mawadisigosiweg
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+Excl+2Sg: mawadisigoosiwan
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+Excl+3PlProx: mawadisaasiwangidwaa
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+Excl+3SgObv/3PlObv: mawadisimaasiwangid
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+Excl+3SgProx: mawadisaasiwangid
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+Incl+3PlProx: mawadisaasiwangwaa
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+Incl+3SgObv/3PlObv: mawadisimaasiwang
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+Incl+3SgProx: mawadisaasiwang
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+X+1Sg: mawadisigoosiwaan
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+X+2Pl: mawadisigoosiweg
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+X+2Sg: mawadisigoosiwan
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+X+3PlProx: mawadisaasiwindwaa
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+X+3SgObv/3PlObv: mawadisimaasiwind
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+X+3SgProx: mawadisaasiwind
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+X+Excl: mawadisigoosiwaang
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+X+Incl: mawadisigoosiwang
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg/0Pl+1Sg: mawadisigoyaan
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg/0Pl+2Pl: mawadisigoyeg
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg/0Pl+2Sg: mawadisigoyan
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg/0Pl+3PlProx: mawadisigowaad
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg/0Pl+3SgObv/3PlObv: mawadisigonid
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg/0Pl+3SgProx: mawadisigod
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg/0Pl+Excl: mawadisigoyaang
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg/0Pl+Incl: mawadisigoyang
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+1Sg+2Pl: mawadisinagog
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+1Sg+2Sg: mawadisinaan
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3PlProx: mawadisagwaa
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv: mawadisimag
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3SgProx: mawadisag
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+2Pl+1Sg: mawadishiyeg
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+2Pl+3PlProx: mawadisegwaa
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+2Pl+3SgObv/3PlObv: mawadisimeg
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+2Pl+3SgProx: mawadiseg
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+2Pl+Excl: mawadishiyaang
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+2Sg+1Sg: mawadishiyan
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3PlProx: mawadisadwaa
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv: mawadisimad
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3SgProx: mawadisad
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+2Sg+Excl: mawadishiyaang
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3PlProx+1Sg: mawadishiwaad
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3PlProx+2Pl: mawadisinegwaa
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3PlProx+2Sg: mawadisikwaa
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3PlProx+3SgObv/3PlObv: mawadisaawaad
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3PlProx+Excl: mawadishiyangidwaa
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3PlProx+Incl: mawadisinangwaa
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3SgObv/3PlObv+3PlProx: mawadisigowaad
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3SgObv/3PlObv+3SgProx: mawadisigod
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3SgProx+1Sg: mawadishid
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3SgProx+2Pl: mawadisineg
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3SgProx+2Sg: mawadisik
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3SgProx+3SgObv/3PlObv: mawadisaad
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3SgProx+Excl: mawadishiyangid
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3SgProx+Incl: mawadisinang
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+Excl+2Pl: mawadisigooyeg
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+Excl+2Sg: mawadisigooyan
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+Excl+3PlProx: mawadisangidwaa
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+Excl+3SgObv/3PlObv: mawadisimangid
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+Excl+3SgProx: mawadisangid
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+Incl+3PlProx: mawadisangwaa
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+Incl+3SgObv/3PlObv: mawadisimang
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+Incl+3SgProx: mawadisang
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+X+1Sg: mawadisigooyaan
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+X+2Pl: mawadisigooyeg
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+X+2Sg: mawadisigooyan
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+X+3PlProx: mawadisindwaa
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+X+3SgObv/3PlObv: mawadisimind
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+X+3SgProx: mawadisind
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+X+Excl: mawadisigooyaang
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+X+Incl: mawadisigooyang
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+0Sg/0Pl+1Sg: mawadisigosiwaambaan
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+0Sg/0Pl+2Pl: mawadisigosiwegiban
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+0Sg/0Pl+2Sg: mawadisigosiwamban
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+0Sg/0Pl+3PlProx: mawadisigosigwaaban
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+0Sg/0Pl+3SgObv/3PlObv: mawadisigosinigoban
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+0Sg/0Pl+3SgProx: mawadisigosigoban
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+0Sg/0Pl+Excl: mawadisigosiwaangiban
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+0Sg/0Pl+Incl: mawadisigosiwangiban
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+1Sg+2Pl: mawadisisinowagoogoban
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+1Sg+2Sg: mawadisisinowaambaan
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+1Sg+3PlProx: mawadisaasiwagwaaban
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+1Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv: mawadisimaasiwagiban
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+1Sg+3SgProx: mawadisaasiwagiban
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+2Pl+1Sg: mawadishisiwegiban
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+2Pl+3PlProx: mawadisaasiwegwaaban
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+2Pl+3SgObv/3PlObv: mawadisimaasiwegiban
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+2Pl+3SgProx: mawadisaasiwegiban
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+2Pl+Excl: mawadishisiwaangiban
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+2Sg+1Sg: mawadishisiwamban
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+2Sg+3PlProx: mawadisaasiwadwaaban
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+2Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv: mawadisimaasiwadiban
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+2Sg+3SgProx: mawadisaasiwadiban
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+2Sg+Excl: mawadishisiwaangiban
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3PlProx+1Sg: mawadishisigwaaban
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3PlProx+2Pl: mawadisigoosiwegiban
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3PlProx+2Sg: mawadisisinowegwaaban
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3PlProx+3SgObv/3PlObv: mawadisaasigwaaban
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3PlProx+Excl: mawadishisiwangidwaaban
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3PlProx+Incl: mawadisisinowangwaaban
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3SgObv/3PlObv+3PlProx: mawadisigosigwaaban
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3SgObv/3PlObv+3SgProx: mawadisigosigoban
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3SgProx+1Sg: mawadishisigoban
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3SgProx+2Pl: mawadisigoosiwamban
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3SgProx+2Sg: mawadisisinowegiban
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3SgProx+3SgObv/3PlObv: mawadisaasigoban
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3SgProx+Excl: mawadishisiwangidiban
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3SgProx+Incl: mawadisisinowangiban
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+Excl+2Pl: mawadisisinokwaaban
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+Excl+2Sg: mawadisisinokiban
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+Excl+3PlProx: mawadisaasiwangidwaaban
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+Excl+3SgObv/3PlObv: mawadisimaasiwangidiban
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+Excl+3SgProx: mawadisangidiban
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+Incl+3PlProx: mawadisaasiwangwaaban
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+Incl+3SgObv/3PlObv: mawadisimaasiwangiban
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+Incl+3SgProx: mawadisaasiwangiban
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+X+1Sg: mawadisigoosiwaambaan
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+X+2Pl: mawadisigoosiwegiban
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+X+2Sg: mawadisigoosiwamban
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+X+3PlProx: mawadisaasiwindwaaban
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+X+3SgObv/3PlObv: mawadisimaasiwindiban
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+X+3SgProx: mawadisaasiwindiban
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+X+Excl: mawadisigoosiwaangiban
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+X+Incl: mawadisigoosiwangiban
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+0Sg/0Pl+1Sg: mawadisigoyaambaan
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+0Sg/0Pl+2Pl: mawadisigoyegiban
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+0Sg/0Pl+2Sg: mawadisigoyamban
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+0Sg/0Pl+3PlProx: mawadisigowaapan
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+0Sg/0Pl+3SgObv/3PlObv: mawadisigonipan
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+0Sg/0Pl+3SgProx: mawadisigopan
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+0Sg/0Pl+Excl: mawadisigoyaangiban
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+0Sg/0Pl+Incl: mawadisigoyangiban
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+1Sg+2Pl: mawadisinagoogoban
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+1Sg+2Sg: mawadisinaambaan
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+1Sg+3PlProx: mawadisagwaaban
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+1Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv: mawadisimagiban
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+1Sg+3SgProx: mawadisagiban
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2Pl+1Sg: mawadishiyegiban
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2Pl+3PlProx: mawadisegwaaban
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2Pl+3SgObv/3PlObv: mawadisimegiban
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2Pl+3SgProx: mawadisegiban
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2Pl+Excl: mawadishiyaangiban
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2Sg+1Sg: mawadishiyamban
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2Sg+3PlProx: mawadisadwaaban
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv: mawadisimadiban
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2Sg+3SgProx: mawadisadiban
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2Sg+Excl: mawadishiyaangiban
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3PlProx+1Sg: mawadishiwaapan
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3PlProx+2Pl: mawadisigooyegiban
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3PlProx+2Sg: mawadisinegwaaban
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3PlProx+3SgObv/3PlObv: mawadisaawaapan
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3PlProx+Excl: mawadishiyangidwaaban
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3PlProx+Incl: mawadisinangwaaban
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3SgObv/3PlObv+3PlProx: mawadisigowaapan
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3SgObv/3PlObv+3SgProx: mawadisigopan
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3SgProx+1Sg: mawadishipan
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3SgProx+2Pl: mawadisigooyamban
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3SgProx+2Sg: mawadisinegiban
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3SgProx+3SgObv/3PlObv: mawadisaapan
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3SgProx+Excl: mawadishiyangidiban
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3SgProx+Incl: mawadisinangiban
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+Excl+2Pl: mawadisikwaaban
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+Excl+2Sg: mawadisikiban
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+Excl+3PlProx: mawadisangidwaaban
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+Excl+3SgObv/3PlObv: mawadisimangidiban
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+Excl+3SgProx: mawadisangidiban
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+Incl+3PlProx: mawadisangwaaban
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+Incl+3SgObv/3PlObv: mawadisimangiban
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+Incl+3SgProx: mawadisangiban
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+X+1Sg: mawadisigooyaambaan
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+X+2Pl: mawadisigooyegiban
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+X+2Sg: mawadisigooyamban
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+X+3PlProx: mawadisindwaaban
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+X+3SgObv/3PlObv: mawadisimindiban
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+X+3SgProx: mawadisindiban
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+X+Excl: mawadisigooyaangiban
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+X+Incl: mawadisigooyangiban
